zh-TW: 合規認證: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; 未認證/僅限越野使用; RoHS; SAE; 其他
ru: Сертификация соответствия: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Не сертифицировано / только для бездорожья; RoHS; SAE; Другое
th: 123ใบรับรองการปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนด: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง/ใช้สำหรับออฟโรดเท่านั้น; RoHS; SAE; อื่นๆ
ko: 규정 준수 인증: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; 미인증/오프로드 전용; RoHS; SAE; 기타
el: Πιστοποιήσεις συμμόρφωσης: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Χωρίς πιστοποίηση/Μόνο για χρήση εκτός δρόμου; RoHS; SAE; Άλλο
de: Konformitätszertifizierung: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-Prüfzeichen; ECE; FCC; Nicht zertifiziert/Nur für den Offroad-Einsatz; RoHS; SAE; Sonstige
ja: コンプライアンス認証: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; Eマーク; ECE; FCC; 非認証 / オフロード専用; RoHS; SAE; その他
nl: Nalevingscertificering: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Niet gecertificeerd/Alleen voor offroad-gebruik; RoHS; SAE; Overig
en: Compliance certification: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Not certified/Off-road use only; RoHS; SAE; Other
ro-RO: Certificare de conformitate: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; Marcaj E; ECE; FCC; Necertificat/Doar pentru utilizare off-road; RoHS; SAE; Altele
zh-CN: 合规认证: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; 未认证/仅限越野使用; RoHS; SAE; 其他
sk-SK: Certifikát zhody: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Bez certifikácie/len na jazdu mimo cesty; RoHS; SAE; Iné
es: Certificación de cumplimiento: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; No certificado/solo para uso todoterreno; RoHS; SAE; Otra
sl-SI: Certifikati o skladnosti: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; Oznaka E; ECE; FCC; Ni certificirano/samo za terensko vožnjo; RoHS; SAE; Drugo
hr-HR: Certifikat o sukladnosti: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-oznaka; ECE; FCC; Bez certifikata / samo za terensku vožnju (off-road); RoHS; SAE; Ostalo
pt-BR: Certificação de conformidade: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Não certificado/Apenas para uso fora de estrada; RoHS; SAE; Outro
da: Overholdelsescertificeringer: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mærke; ECE; FCC; Ikke certificeret/kun til offroad-brug; RoHS; SAE; Anden
tr: Uygunluk sertifikası: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Sertifikasız/Yalnızca arazi kullanımı için; RoHS; SAE; Diğer
cs: Osvědčení o shodě: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; Značka E; ECE; FCC; Bez certifikace / pouze pro jízdu mimo silnice; RoHS; SAE; Jiné
hu: Megfelelőségi tanúsítványok: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-jelölés; ECE; FCC; Nem minősített / Kizárólag közúti forgalmon kívüli használatra; RoHS; SAE; Egyéb
sv: Efterlevnadscertifikat: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-märkning; ECE; FCC; Ej certifierad/endast för terrängbruk; RoHS; SAE; Annan
bg-BG: Сертификат за съответствие: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Без сертификат / само за офроуд; RoHS; SAE; Друго
fr: Certifications de conformité: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Non certifié/usage hors route uniquement; RoHS; SAE; Autre
lt-LT: Atitikties sertifikatas: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; „E-mark“; ECE; FCC; Nesertifikuota / skirta naudoti tik bekelėje; RoHS; SAE; Kita
fi: Vaatimustenmukaisuustodistus: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-merkintä; ECE; FCC; Ei sertifioitu / vain maastokäyttöön; RoHS; SAE; Muu
pl: Certyfikacja zgodności: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; Znak E; ECE; FCC; Brak certyfikatu / tylko do użytku terenowego; RoHS; SAE; Inne
it: Certificazioni di conformità: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Non certificato/solo per uso fuoristrada; RoHS; SAE; Altro
vi: Chứng nhận hợp chuẩn / chứng nhận tuân thủ: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Không được chứng nhận/Chỉ dùng cho đường địa hình; RoHS; SAE; Khác
nb: Samsvarssertifisering: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-merke; ECE; FCC; Ikke sertifisert / kun for terrengbruk; RoHS; SAE; Annet
pt-PT: Certificação de conformidade: CE; CISPR 25; DOT; E-mark; ECE; FCC; Sem certificação/apenas para uso fora de estrada; RoHS; SAE; Outra